Utah statutes.
58-68-801.   Disclosure of financial interest by licensee.  

(1)  Licensees under this chapter may not refer patients, clients, or customers to any clinical laboratory, ambulatory or surgical care facilities, or other treatment or rehabilitation services such as physical therapy, cardiac rehabilitation, radiology services, dispensing optical lens facility, or lithotripsy, in which the licensee or a member of the licensee's immediate family has any financial relationship as that term is described in 42 U.S.C.  1395nn, unless the licensee at the time of making the referral discloses that relationship, in writing, to the patient, client, or customer.

(2)  The written disclosure under Subsection (1) shall also state the patient may choose any facility or service center for purpose of having the laboratory work or treatment service performed.



Enacted by Chapter 248, 1996 General Session

